Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2156.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 5 TLSB 5662YH (2) 91 je/js H.F. 2156 Section 1. Section 96.4, subsection 5, paragraph b, Code 1 2026, is amended by striking the paragraph. 2 Sec. 2. Section 96.4, subsection 5, paragraph c, Code 2026, 3 is amended to read as follows: 4 c. With respect to services for an educational institution 5 in any capacity under paragraph âaâ or âbâ , benefits shall not 6 be paid to an individual for any week of unemployment which 7 begins during an established and customary vacation period 8 or holiday recess if the individual performs the services in 9 the period immediately before such vacation period or holiday 10 recess, and the individual has reasonable assurance that the 11 individual will perform the services in the period immediately 12 following such vacation period or holiday recess. 13 Sec. 3. STATE MANDATE FUNDING SPECIFIED. In accordance 14 with section 25B.2, subsection 3, the state cost of requiring 15 compliance with any state mandate included in this Act shall 16 be paid by a school district from state school foundation aid 17 received by the school district under section 257.16. This 18 specification of the payment of the state cost shall be deemed 19 to meet all of the state funding-related requirements of 20 section 25B.2, subsection 3, and no additional state funding 21 shall be necessary for the full implementation of this Act 22 by and enforcement of this Act against all affected school 23 districts. 24